Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5435.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 37-2 of the General Laws entitled "State Purchases" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
37-2-83. Prohibiting state agencies from entering into contracts limiting ability to
install or run certain software.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "State agencies" has the same meaning as defined in § 37-2-7.
(2) "State software application purchases" means all types of agreements, including grants
and orders, for the purchase or disposal of supplies, services, construction, or any other item,
entered into by a state agency the cost or price of which is to be paid, in whole or in part, with or
out of state funds. It includes awards; contracts of a fixed-price, cost, cost-plus-a-fixed-fee, or
incentive type; contracts providing for the issuance of job or task orders; leases; letter contracts;
purchase orders; and construction management contracts. It also includes supplemental agreements
with respect to any of the foregoing documents.
(b) A state contract for the licensing of software applications, which are intended to be
installed by a state agency and designed to run on generally available desktop or server hardware,
shall not limit a state agency's ability to install or run the software on the hardware of the state
agency's choosing.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001029
========
LC001029 - Page 2 of 3